src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_11_E2I_prop !propernouns

  +Sg+Nom      :^E2I         K               ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       gen_n_sg        ; !Lemmijoven
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       gen_n_sg        ; !Lemmijoen
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:              par_V           ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^E2I          par_A           ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^E2I          par_A           ; 
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ; 
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2          gen_Vn          ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2       gen_tten        ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2       gen_tten        ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2          par_V           ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2          par_A           ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2          par_A           ; 
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ; 
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_11_E2I_pl        !!= @CODE@ sakset, hykset
+N+Dial/Por    :^Por         x_11_E2I_pl  ;
+N+Dial/Var    :^Var         x_11_E2I_pl  ;
+N+Dial/Jok    :^Jok         x_11_E2I_pl  ;

LEXICON x_11_E2I_pl
  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2         gen_Vn          ; ! hyksiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         par_V           ; ! hyksii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_11_pl        !!= * @CODE@  "villahousut", lyhyt vokali, yks vartalo, kasvot
+N             :       x_11_pl    ;
+N+Pl          :       nom_t      ; ! housut, kasvot

LEXICON x_11_pl        !!= * @CODE@ ! Seems like no adjectives call this?


  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2               gen_n           ; ! kasvoin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2               gen_tten        ; ! kasvoitten, housuitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2               gen_tten        ; ! kasvoitten, housuitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2               par_end         ; ! kasvoi
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>j                par_A           ; ! kasvoja
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>j                par_A           ; ! kasvoja
  +Pl          :^HMETA             ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl

  ! LEXICON vanha_kk-longgenpl
  !      +Gen:%>kk%>i2           #               ; ! kk ?? Tsekkaa..

  !LEXICON vanha_kk-longgparpl
  ! +Par:%>kk%>i2 # ; ! kk ?? Tsekkaa..


LEXICON n_11_i_pl  ! sortsit
+N             :             x_11_i_pl     ;

LEXICON x_11_i_pl
  x_11_i_oblique_pl ;

LEXICON x_11_i_oblique_pl
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^AO%>i2      gen_n           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^AO       gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^AO       gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^AO%>i2      par_end         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          par_A           ;
  +Pl         :^AO^HMETA    ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^AO%>i2      ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^AO%>i2      com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2   sgpl_cases_even_Por ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO       sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO       sgpl_cases_even ;


LEXICON n_11_ae_pl ! päivät
+N:             x_11_ae_pl     ;

LEXICON x_11_ae_pl
+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2      gen_in          ; ! päiviin
+Pl+Dial/Por:          ill_hiin        ; ! päivhiin
+Pl+Dial/Var:          ill_hiin        ; ! päivhiin
+Pl+Dial/Jok:          ill_hiin        ; ! päivhiin
  
!Por
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG          nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             par_V           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ;

!Jok
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG              nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2             par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ;

!Var
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG              nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2          gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2             par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2             ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2             com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; 

LEXICON n_21_C !!= * @CODE@ lainasanat, badminton
+N+Sg: nom_end ;
+N:i x_21 ;

LEXICON n_21        !!= * @CODE@  opettaaja, karamelli
n_21_sg ;
n_21_pl ;

LEXICON n_21_sg
+N         :    x_21  ;
+N+Sg      :    nom_R    ;

LEXICON n_21_pl
+N: x_21_pl ;

LEXICON x_21 ! adjektiivit ynnä muut
x_21_sg ;
x_21_pl ;

LEXICON x_21_sg
  +Sg      :         nom_end                  ;
  +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:         par_V              ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg+Dial/Var:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn           ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA              ; ! karamellina
  +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even    ; ! the same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON x_21_pl
  +Pl      :^WG      nom_t              ; ! liberaalit
  +Dial/Por:         x_21_pl_por        ;
  +Dial/Jok:         x_21_pl_var        ;
  +Dial/Var:         x_21_pl_var        ;

        !   +Pl:^WG%>i2       gen_tten           ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          par_tA             ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          par_end            ; !liberaali, dialissa on liberaalia?
        !   +Pl:%>i2          ess_nA                ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          com_ne             ;

LEXICON x_21_pl_por
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2    gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       par_tA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       par_end     ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA     ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       ess_nA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       com_ne      ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2  sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  
  !  +Pl+Dial/Por :^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii


LEXICON x_21_pl_var ! TODO look at Dummy symbol structure in Twolc, now that we
                          ! need more of them. Rules for when (which problems) and
                          ! where (in the string/word "structure") ! ^WG before ^A2I always?
  +Pl      :^WG^A2I   gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :^A2I      par_A       ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA    ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :^A2I      ess_nA      ; ! karamelline
  +Pl      :^A2I      com_ne      ; ! karamellina
  +Pl      :^WG^A2I    sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0 karamellitten

! +Pl:%>i2        gen_n              ; opettaajiin
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2ksi K ; Lene removed this one
! !+Pl+Tra:%>i2kse     PxxK               ;

LEXICON n_21_ae_even
+N: x_21_ae_even ;
