src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
puoliveljet:puoli#velje n_11_E2I_pl ;
brodeerisakset:brodeeri#sakse n_11_E2I_pl ;
helmet:helme n_11_E2I_pl ;
sakset:sakse n_11_E2I_pl ;
kiharahykset:kihara#hykse n_11_E2I_pl ;
hykset:hykse n_11_E2I_pl ;
maanpruukit:maan#pruuk2i n_11_i_pl ;
tavarapakit:tavara#pakki n_11_i_pl ;
episodi:episodi n_21 ;
ammattifotograafi:ammatti#fotograafi n_21 ;
psykoloogi:psykoloogi n_21 ;
vaaranlajet:vaaran#laje n_11_E2I_pl ;
lajet:laje n_11_E2I_pl ;
brakit:brak2i n_11_i_pl ;
alakasvit:ala#kasvi n_11_i_pl ;
botanikki:botanikki n_21 ;
salmiakki:salmiakki n_21 ;
estetikki:estetikki n_21 ;
juomingit:juominki n_21_pl ;
improvisasuuni:improvisasuuni n_21 ;
dramatiseerinki:dramatiseerinki n_21 ;
normeerinki:normeerinki n_21 ;
sortteerinki:sortteerinki n_21 ;
radikaali:radikaali n_21 ;
personaali:personaali n_21 ;
hihtofestivaali:hihto#festivaali n_21 ;
kirjakapitteli:kirja#kapitteli n_21 ;
akvarelli:akvarelli n_21 ;
viinamonopooli:viina#monopooli n_21 ;
nationalismi:nationalismi n_21 ;
evankeeliumi:evankeeliumi n_21 ;
badminton:badminton n_21_C ;
hygieeni:hygieeni n_21 ;
proteiini:proteiini n_21 ;
anadromi:anadromi n_21 ;
matematikkididaktikki:matematikki#didaktikki n_21 ;
fioliini:fioliini n_21 ;
digitaalileksikoni:digitaali#leksikoni n_21 ;
mikrofooni:mikrofooni n_21 ;
petisuuni:petisuuni n_21 ;
kommisuuni+Err/Orth:kommisjuuni n_21 ;
organisasuuni+Err/Orth:organisasioni n_21 ;
injeksuuni:injeksuuni n_21 ;
kuvadokumentasuuni+Err/Orth:kuva#dokumentašuuni n_21 ;
fileettiproduksuuni:fileetti#produksuuni n_21 ;
pukemistradisuuni:pukemis#tradisuuni n_21 ;
koleraapi:koleraap2i n_21 ;
paarit:paari n_11_i_pl ;
kakkorästit:kakko#rästi n_11_i_pl ;
leipärästit:leipä#rästi n_11_i_pl ;
murkinarästit:murkina#rästi n_11_i_pl ;
ruokarästit:ruoka#rästi n_11_i_pl ;
luurästit:luu#rästi n_11_i_pl ;
rästit:rästi n_11_i_pl ;
fepruaari:fepruaari n_21 ;
teoreetikkari:teoreetikkari n_21 ;
indiviidi:indiviidi n_21 ;
oktooperi:oktooperi n_21 ;
orkesteri:orkesteri n_21 ;
teatteri:teatteri n_21 ;
siitosorit:siitos#ori n_11_i_pl ;
analysaattori:analysaattori n_21 ;
unioni:unioni n_21 ;
miljunääri:miljunääri n_21 ;
kouludirektööri:koulu#direktööri n_21 ;
arransööri:arransööri n_21 ;
redaktööri:redaktööri n_21 ;
analyysi:analyysi n_21 ;
overalsit:overalsi n_21_pl ;
mantelit:manteli n_21_pl ;
konkuransi:konkuransi n_21 ;
ambulansi+Err/Orth:ambulanssi n_21 ;
kompetenssi:kompetenssi n_21 ;
pluskvamperfekti:pluskvamperfekti n_21 ;
kalanmolot:kalan#molo n_11_pl ;
elämänolot:elämän#olo n_11_pl ;
luononolot:luonon#olo n_11_pl ;
olot:olo n_11_pl ;
jäähyvästit:jää#hyvästi n_21_pl ;
lihapollerit:liha#polleri n_21_pl ;
servietti:servietti n_21 ;
palmureservaatti:palmu#reservaatti n_21 ;
rekvisiitti:rekvisiitti n_21 ;
testamentti:testamentti n_21 ;
monumentti:monumentti n_21 ;
genetiivi:genetiivi n_21 ;
rauhankirkonmenot:rauhan#kirkon#meno n_11_pl ;
aivot:aivo n_11_pl ;
kasvot:kasvo n_11_pl ;
köökineuvot:köökineuvo n_11_pl ;
neulomaneuvot:neuloma#neuvo n_11_pl ;
piđot:piđo n_11_pl ;
prakut:praku n_11_pl ;
lastenvaunut:lasten#vaunu n_11_pl ;
rullatraput:rulla#trapu n_11_pl ;
ruvanloput:ruvan#lopu n_11_pl ;
villahousut:villa#housu n_11_pl ;
uimahousut:uima#housu n_11_pl ;
dongerihousut:dongeri#housu n_11_pl ;
dongeriihousut:dongerii#housu n_11_pl ;
palonkihousut:palonki#housu n_11_pl ;
alushousut:alus#housu n_11_pl ;
sađethousut:sađet#housu n_11_pl ;
housut:housu n_11_pl ;
sukkatikut:sukka#tiku n_11_pl ;
mattatraasut:matta#traasu n_11_pl ;
sortsit:sortsi n_11_i_pl ;
kuuntauđit:kuuntauti n_11_i_pl ;
cornfleiksit:corn#fleiksi n_11_i_pl ;
maateriäijit:maateri#äiji n_11_i_pl ;
maateriämmit:maateri#ämmi n_11_i_pl ;
kraaterijärvet:kraateri#järve n_11_E2I_pl ;
revontulet:revon#tule n_11_E2I_pl ;
äänestääjä:äänestääjä n_21_ae_even ;
mähättäjä:mähättäjä n_21_ae_even ;
lähättääjä:lähättääjä n_21_ae_even ;
vierasesittääjä:vieras#esittääjä n_21_ae_even ;
ympärilevittääjä:ympäri#levittääjä n_21_ae_even ;
pitenemä:pitenemä n_21_ae_even ;
syntymäpäivät:syntymäpäivä n_11_ae_pl ;
fiinikengät:fiini#kenkä n_11_ae_pl ;
lakkikengät:lakki#kenkä n_11_ae_pl ;
vuotakengät:vuota#kenkä n_11_ae_pl ;
pyhäkengät:pyhä#kenkä n_11_ae_pl ;
käsikärröt:käsi#kärrö n_11_pl ;
kottikärröt:kotti#kärrö n_11_pl ;
pöräkärröt:pörä#kärrö n_11_pl ;
